Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 8. County Treasurers

Cross references. —

For duty of treasurer of old county to pay taxes collected to new county treasurer, see §

18-1-314

.

As to bonds of county officers generally, see §

18-3-102

.

As to salary of county treasurer, see §

18-3-107

.

For authority of county treasurer to appoint deputy, see §

18-3-107

.

For duty of county commissioners to provide county officers with stationery and supplies, see §

18-3-514

.

For duty of treasurer as custodian of county building fund, see §

18-4-201

.

For duty of treasurer to register bonds in book and as to information to be shown, see §

18-4-308

.

As to application by county treasurer of funds derived from sale of county funding bonds and liability for misappropriation, see §

18-4-506

.

For constitutional provisions as to depositories for public moneys, see art. 15, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation on state debt, creation of state debt in excess of taxes for current year, limitation on county and municipal debt, etc., see art. 16, §§ 1 to 11, Wyo. Const.

As to payment of money out of state treasury, see art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const.

§ 18-3-801.
Election.

There shall be elected in each county a county treasurer, who shall be a resident of the county in which the county treasurer serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county treasurer serves.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1083; C.S. 1910, § 1181; C.S. 1920, § 1427; R.S. 1931, § 30-1101; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 27-1301; Laws 1949, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-199; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added ", who shall be a resident of the county in which the county treasurer serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county treasurer serves."

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 85, Laws 1937, was a general law relating to terms of county officers.

The basic law for establishing county offices and government was ch. 28, C.L. 1876.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 165, § 2, provides: "The residency requirements of this act shall apply to elected or appointed county officers whose terms commence on or after the effective date of this act."

§ 18-3-802.
Duty as collector of taxes.

Each county treasurer is collector of taxes and shall perform such duties as prescribed by law. The bond given by each county treasurer, as provided by W.S.

18-3-102

, shall cover any violation of his duties as collector of taxes, any failure on his part to pay over to the proper person any monies received as collector of taxes and any failure to deliver to any person authorized by law to receive any books, papers or other property appertaining to his duties as collector of taxes.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 45, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 1086; C.S. 1910, § 1183; C.S. 1920, § 1429; R.S. 1931, § 30-1103; C.S. 1945, § 27-1302; W.S. 1957, § 18-200; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

In general. —

The county treasurer is by virtue of his office collector of taxes. School Dist. No. 21 v. School Dist. v. Board of Comm'rs, 15 Wyo. 73, 86 P. 24,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1906).

Money held on behalf of school district. —

A county treasurer has a statutory duty and a common law fiduciary duty to act with reasonable skill, diligence, good faith and honesty with regard to money held on behalf of a school district and investing these funds may be required in order to comply with these duties; therefore, interest, as an accretion or increment of the principal fund earning it, belongs to the fund on which the interest was earned. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Loss in bank failure. —

A county treasurer is not liable for moneys held by him strictly as treasurer, which are lost by failure of a bank in which he has deposited them, where he was without fault or negligence. Roberts v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1899).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1950).

§ 18-3-803.
Liability for collection of taxes.

Each county treasurer is responsible on his bond for reasonable skill, diligence, good faith and honesty in the performance of his duties. He shall diligently endeavor to collect all taxes due the county and state and is responsible on his bond for willfully, carelessly or negligently allowing taxes to remain unpaid. No county treasurer who has honestly, diligently and in good faith endeavored to collect the taxes shall be held responsible on his bond for any unpaid taxes.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1184; C.S. 1920, § 1430; R.S. 1931, § 30-1104; C.S. 1945, § 27-1305; W.S. 1957, § 18-201; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Money held on behalf of school district. —

A county treasurer has a statutory duty and a common law fiduciary duty to act with reasonable skill, diligence, good faith and honesty with regard to money held on behalf of a school district and investing these funds may be required in order to comply with these duties; therefore, interest, as an accretion or increment of the principal fund earning it, belongs to the fund on which the interest was earned. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Liability of surety. —

Sureties on a treasurer's bond, conditioned that the latter shall pay and account for all moneys as required by law, are liable for funds lost before a new bond was given, though the treasurer's duty to pay over the funds did not arise until after the new bond was given and his successor was installed. Roberts v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1899).

§ 18-3-804.
Duty to keep accounts of receipts and expenditures generally.

Each county treasurer shall keep a true account of the receipts and expenditures of all monies which come into his office and shall perform all duties required by law.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 45, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 1086; C.S. 1910, § 1185; C.S. 1920, § 1431; R.S. 1931, § 30-1105; C.S. 1945, § 27-1303; W.S. 1957, § 18-202; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Applied

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Roberts v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1899).

§ 18-3-805.
Duty to receive funds; payments made on commissioners' warrants.

Each county treasurer shall receive all monies belonging to the county and state, and all monies required by law to be paid to him. All monies received for the use of the county shall be paid out only on the orders or warrants issued by the board of county commissioners as prescribed by law except where provisions for the payment are otherwise made by law.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 45, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 1087; C.S. 1910, § 1186; C.S. 1920, § 1432; R.S. 1931, § 30-1106; C.S. 1945, § 27-1304; W.S. 1957, § 18-203; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Funds included. —

The funds over which the board of commissioners have control are designated herein; they do not include funds belonging to a school district. School Dist. No. 21 v. School Dist. v. Board of Comm'rs, 15 Wyo. 73, 86 P. 24,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1906).

Money held on behalf of school district. —

A county treasurer has a statutory duty and a common law fiduciary duty to act with reasonable skill, diligence, good faith and honesty with regard to money held on behalf of a school district and investing these funds may be required in order to comply with these duties; therefore, interest, as an accretion or increment of the principal fund earning it, belongs to the fund on which the interest was earned. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Roberts v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1899).

§ 18-3-806.
Manner of keeping account of receipts and expenditures; inspection of records; annual settlement; report.

Each county treasurer shall keep a true account of the receipts and expenditure of all monies which come into his office in a book or books kept by him for that purpose. The books shall be available at all times for inspection by the board of county commissioners or any member thereof, county and state officers or any citizen. At the annual meeting of the board of county commissioners on the first Monday in January of each year or at such other time as they may direct, the county treasurer shall settle with them his account for the preceding year, and shall exhibit to them all his books, accounts and vouchers to be audited and allowed. He shall also report at each regular meeting of the board of county commissioners of the amount of monies received and expended by him during the intervening time, if so required.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1826; R.S. 1899, § 1088; C.S. 1910, § 1187; C.S. 1920, § 1433; R.S. 1931, § 30-1107; C.S. 1945, § 27-1306; W.S. 1957, § 18-204; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Prior to ch. 45, Laws 1890-91, the judge of probate was ex officio county treasurer as provided by §§ 1 to 5, art. II, ch. 28, C.L. 1876, which sections were repealed by ch. 45, Laws 1890-91. Section 6, ch. 28, C.L. 1876, was the basic law establishing county offices and government.

Applied

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Roberts v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1899).

§ 18-3-807.
Order in which warrants paid.

Properly attested county orders or warrants are entitled to preference for payment according to date of presentation and acceptance at the treasurer’s office, the oldest date having preference.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1827; Laws 1895, ch. 85, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 1089; C.S. 1910, § 1188; C.S. 1920, § 1434; R.S. 1931, § 30-1108; C.S. 1945, § 27-1307; W.S. 1957, § 18-205; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-3-808.
Settlement upon resignation or removal; penalty for failure to deliver books.

Upon the resignation or removal from office of any county treasurer, all books, papers and monies belonging to his office shall be delivered to his successor upon the oath of the preceding treasurer or, in case of his death, upon the oath of his executors or administrators. If any preceding treasurer or his executors or administrators neglect or refuse to deliver such books, papers and monies, on oath, when lawfully demanded, such person shall forfeit a sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), and is liable upon his official bond for such refusal or neglect.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 1828; R.S. 1899, § 1090; C.S. 1910, § 1189; C.S. 1920, § 1435; R.S. 1931, § 30-1109; C.S. 1945, § 27-1308; W.S. 1957, § 18-206; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Treasurer as trustee; deposit with insolvent. —

A county treasurer is merely custodian or trustee of public moneys coming into his hands by virtue of office, and upon deposit of such funds with one who knows their trust character, and who afterwards becomes insolvent, the county may sue to impress a trust on the insolvent estate, if such funds may be identified, or traced to some particular fund or property of the estate. State v. Foster, 5 Wyo. 199, 38 P. 926,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1895).

§ 18-3-809.
Treasurer to countersign and register all warrants.

When county orders or warrants are drawn by the county clerk and properly signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners, before they are delivered to the person for whose benefit the same are drawn, they shall be presented by the clerk to the county treasurer who shall personally countersign the same and enter in a book kept by him for that purpose, the date, amount and number of each order or warrant, and the name of the person in whose favor the orders or warrants are drawn.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1829; R.S. 1899, § 1091; C.S. 1910, § 1190; C.S. 1920, § 1436; R.S. 1931, § 30-1110; C.S. 1945, § 27-1309; W.S. 1957, § 18-207; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

In general. —

The county treasurer is to countersign warrants. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

§ 18-3-810.
Restrictions upon countersigning warrants.

No county treasurer shall countersign any blank county order or warrant or other order or warrant until he is satisfied that the order or warrant was ordered drawn by the board of county commissioners.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1830; R.S. 1899, § 1092; C.S. 1910, § 1191; C.S. 1920, § 1437; R.S. 1931, § 30-1111; C.S. 1945, § 27-1310; W.S. 1957, § 18-208; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-3-811.
Register of county orders.

Each county treasurer shall keep in his office a book called the register of county orders wherein shall be entered on the date of the presentation thereof and without interval or blank line between any entry and the one preceding it every county order, warrant or other certificate or evidence of county indebtedness presented for payment whether or not it is then paid, the date and number of such order or warrant, the amount payable, the name of the person to whom such order or warrant is payable, and the name of the person presenting the same. Every register of county orders shall be available for inspection and examination by any person during usual business hours.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1831; R.S. 1899, § 1093; C.S. 1910, § 1192; C.S. 1920, § 1438; R.S. 1931, § 30-1112; C.S. 1945, § 27-1311; W.S. 1957, § 18-209; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-3-812.
Settlement with state treasurer.

Each county treasurer shall pay the state treasurer all state taxes and other state monies received by him and shall give the state treasurer a written statement that he has paid over the same funds in kind as received by him and has not exchanged or bartered any of the monies, coin, bank bills, treasury notes or other currency received by him for the state for any auditor’s warrants, state scrip or other certificates or evidences of indebtedness of the state, nor permitted the same to be done, and that all state auditor’s warrants or other certificates or evidences of indebtedness of the state delivered by him to the treasurer, were received in payment of state taxes or other monies due the state. Each statement shall be sworn to before any person authorized to administer oaths and shall be filed and preserved in his office. False swearing in the statement is subject to the penalty provided by W.S.

6-5-303

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1832; R.S.1899, § 1094; C.S. 1910, § 1193; C.S. 1920, § 1439, R.S. 1931, § 30-1113; C.S. 1945, § 27-1312; W.S. 1957, § 18-210; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

6-5-303

” for “W.S. 6-154.1.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

In general. —

Taxes collected for state purposes do not belong to the county. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Loss by bank failure. —

Where neither the law nor his bond expressly requires a county treasurer to safely keep funds, a condition in the bond that he shall deliver over to his successor, or other person authorized by law, to receive the same, all moneys belonging to his office, does not make him an insurer of the public funds, or liable for a loss resulting from the failure of a bank in which he has deposited funds, he being without fault or negligence. Roberts v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1899).

§ 18-3-813.
Malfeasance of treasurer or deputy.

Every county treasurer or deputy county treasurer who does not keep in his office a register of county orders as required by W.S.

18-3-811

, or does not enter at the time of presentation every county order presented to him for payment, or makes any false entry therein, or does not pay any order presented to him for payment, there being money in the treasury appropriated for that purpose or from which by law the same ought to be paid is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), and the court may adjudge that such treasurer be removed from office.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 1833; R.S. 1899, § 1095; C.S. 1910, § 1194; C.S. 1920, § 1440; R.S. 1931, § 30-1114; C.S. 1945, § 27-1313; W.S. 1957, § 18-211; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Construction. —

Statute cannot be given meaning that would warrant punishment of a treasurer who refuses to pay in obedience to order of county board to refuse payment. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Allegation of malfeasance insufficient. —

Allegation at close of an indictment that a defendant county officer “was then and there unlawfully and corruptly guilty of malfeasance” was insufficient. McCarthy v. Territory, 1 Wyo. 311,

1876 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1876).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of public officer for interest or other earnings received on public money in his possession, 5 ALR2d 257.

§ 18-3-814.
Officers to pay over monies and prepare statement for commissioners monthly; forfeiture.

Every elected or appointed county officer required or permitted to receive and pay to the county treasurer any taxes, fines, fees or other monies shall no later than the twenty-fifth day of each month following the month of collection pay the same to the county treasurer and take his official receipt therefor. If the money has not been deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the month following the month of collection, the elected or appointed county officer shall be reported by the county treasurer to the board of county commissioners at their next meeting. Each elected or appointed county officer shall prepare a monthly statement showing the source of all monies received by him and file it with the county clerk for presentation to the board of county commissioners.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. II, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 1834; R.S. 1899, § 1096; C.S. 1910, § 1195; Laws 1913, ch. 21, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1441; R.S. 1931, § 30-1115; C.S. 1945, § 27-1314; W.S. 1957, § 18-212; Laws 1969, ch. 182, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2010, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “Every elected or appointed county” for “Every district attorney and elected or appointed county or precinct”; inserted “following the month of collection” twice; substituted “elected or appointed county officer shall be reported by the county treasurer to the board of county commissioners at their next meeting” for “district, county or precinct officer shall forfeit to the county twenty-five dollars ($25.00) a day for each day after the twenty-fifth day of the month during which no deposits are made”; and substituted “Each elected or appointed county” for “Each district, county or precinct” in the last sentence.

Laws 2010, ch. 34 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

Charged with embezzlement. —

Clerk of the district court, notwithstanding duty to pay over receipts each month, was properly charged with embezzlement of year's collections, due when demanded, evidence not showing embezzlement until noncompliance with demands. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Evidence made at least prima facie case that clerk of district court, charged with embezzlement, actually collected amounts certified by him, for which he gave checks to treasurer. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Reports of clerk of the district court, certifying earnings of his office, were competent in embezzlement prosecution. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Demand. —

Demand may be made by either county commissioner or treasurer. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Demands on clerk of district court, last of which was demand for all money due, could be treated as continuous transaction; hence noncompliance with each demand was not separate crime under embezzlement statute. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Demand by county clerk pursuant to county commissioners' request was sufficient. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).